Utah statutes.
41-6a-1206.   Railroad crossing duties respecting crawler type tractor, power shovel, derrick, or other equipment or structure.

(1) A person may not operate or move the following on or across any tracks at a railroad grade crossing without first complying with this section:

(a)  a crawler type tractor;

(b)  a  power shovel;

(c)  a  derrick;

(d)  a  roller; or

(e)  any equipment or structure having:

(i)  normal operating speed of 10 or less miles per hour; or

(ii)  a vertical body or load clearance of less than:

(A)  1/2 inch per foot of the distance between any two adjacent axles; or

(B)  in any event, nine inches measured above the level surface of a roadway.

(2)  Notice of an intended crossing under this section shall be given to the railroad and a reasonable time shall be given to the railroad to provide proper protection at the crossing.

(3) (a)  Before making a crossing under this section the person operating or moving the vehicle or equipment shall first stop within 50 feet but not closer than 15 feet from the nearest rail of the railway.

(b)  While stopped, the operator of the vehicle shall listen and look in both directions along the track for any approaching train and for signals indicating the approach of a railroad train.

(c)  The operator may proceed across the track only when the crossing can be made safely.

(4) The operator of a vehicle shall obey all traffic control devices or the directions of a peace officer or other crossing official at the crossing.

